Utah statutes.
17D-2-601.   Publishing notice of local entity or local building authority resolution or other proceeding.

(1)  The governing body of a local entity or the authority board of a local building authority may provide for the publication of a resolution or other proceeding adopted under this chapter by the governing body or authority board, respectively:

(a)  in a newspaper of general circulation in the local entity; and

(b)  as required in Section 45-1-101.

(2) (a)  If the resolution or other proceeding provides for the local building authority's issuance of bonds, the authority board may, in lieu of publishing the entire resolution or other proceeding, publish a notice of the bonds to be issued.

(b)  Each notice under Subsection (2)(a) shall comply with the requirements of Subsection 11-14-316(2).

(c)  The authority board of a local building authority publishing a notice under Subsection (2)(a) shall make a copy of the resolution or other proceeding authorizing the issuance of the local building authority bonds available for public inspection during regular business hours at the office of the local building authority for a period of at least 30 days after publication of the notice.

